Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.370

Prohibition on practicing in another state—Prohibited from practicing in this state until proceedings of appropriate disciplining authority are completed.

Any individual who applies for a license or temporary practice permit or holds a license or temporary practice permit and is prohibited from practicing a health care profession in another state because of an act of unprofessional conduct that is substantially equivalent to an act of unprofessional conduct prohibited by this chapter or any of the chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040 is prohibited from practicing a health care profession in this state until proceedings of the appropriate disciplining authority have been completed under RCW 18.130.050.

[ 2006 c 99 s 3.]